Utah statutes.
17-52-203.5.   Election to determine whether study committee should be
established.
(1)  The county legislative body shall hold an election under this section if:
(a)  the county legislative body adopts a resolution under Subsection
17-52-202(1); or
(b)  a petition filed under Subsection 17-52-203(1) is certified by the county
clerk under Subsection 17-52-203(3).
(2)  Each election under Subsection (1) shall be a special election, called
and held as required by Sections 20A-1-203 and 20A-1-204 after:
(a)  adoption of a resolution under Subsection 17-52-202(1); or
(b)  certification of a petition under Subsection 17-52-203(3).
(3)  The county clerk shall prepare the ballot for each election under
Subsection (1) with a question that asks substantially as follows:
"Shall a study committee be appointed to consider and possibly recommend a
change in the form of government of _________________________ County?"
